Washington statutes.
RCW 33.46.110

Conversion to federal association—Procedure.

If the bank specifies in the resolution that it intends to become a federal association, it shall proceed to make all filings and do all things which are required by federal laws and regulations to qualify as and become a federal association, and when all such things have been accomplished and a charter has been issued by the appropriate federal agency, the bank shall thereupon cease to be a bank organized under the laws of this state.

[ 1982 c 3 s 89; 1975 1st ex.s. c 83 s 11.]

NOTES:

Severability—1982 c 3: See note following RCW 33.04.002.